North Carolina statutes. Chapter 146. State Lands.
Article 2. Dispositions.

§ 146-3.
What lands may be sold.

Any State lands may be disposed of by the State in the manner prescribed in this Chapter, with the following exceptions:

No submerged lands may be conveyed in fee, but easements therein may be granted, as provided in this Subchapter.

No natural lake belonging to the State or to any State agency on January 1, 1959, and having an area of 50 acres or more, may be in any manner disposed of, but all such lakes shall be retained by the State for the use and benefit of all the people of the State and administered as provided for other recreational areas owned by the State.

History.

1854-5, c. 21; R.C., c. 42, s. 1; Code, s. 2751; Rev., s. 1693; 1911, c. 8; C.S., ss. 7540, 7544; 1929, c. 165; G.S., ss. 146-1, 146-7, 146-12; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-4.
Sales of certain lands; procedure; deeds; disposition of proceeds.

The Department of Administration may sell the vacant and unappropriated lands, swamplands, and lands acquired by the State by virtue of being sold for taxes, at public or private sale, at such times, upon such consideration, in such portions, and upon such terms as are deemed proper by the Department and approved by the Governor and Council of State. Every deed conveying any part of those lands in fee shall be executed in the manner required by

G.S. 146-74

through 146-78, and shall be approved by the Governor and Council of State as therein required. The net proceeds of all such sales of those lands shall be paid into the State Literary Fund. Whenever negotiations are begun by the Department for the purpose of selling swampland or the timber thereon, the Department shall promptly notify the State Board of Education of that fact. If the Board deems the proposed sale inadvisable, it may so inform the Governor and Council of State, who may give due consideration to the representations of the Board in determining whether to approve or disapprove the proposed transaction.

History.

R.C., c. 66, s. 12; 1872-3, c. 194, s. 2; Code, ss. 2514, 2515, 2529; 1889, c. 243, s. 4; Rev., s. 4049; C.S., s. 7621; G.S., s. 146-94; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Public Rights and Coastal Zone Management,” see 51 N.C.L. Rev. 1 (1972).

§ 146-5.
Reservation to the State.

In any sale of the vacant and unappropriated lands or swamplands by the State, the following powers may be expressly reserved to the State, to be exercised according to law:

The State may make any reasonable and expedient regulations respecting the repair of the canals which have been cut by the State, or the enlargement of such canals.

The State may impose taxes on the lands benefited by those canals for their repair, and they shall not be closed.

The navigation of the canals shall be free to all persons, subject to a right in the State to impose tolls.

All landowners on the canals may drain into them, subject only to such general regulations as now are or hereafter may be made by law in such cases.

The roads along the banks of the canals shall be public roads.

History.

1872-3, c. 118; Code, s. 2534; Rev., s. 4050; C.S., s. 7622; G.S., s. 146-95; 1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-6.
Title to land raised from navigable water.

If any land is, by any process of nature or as a result of the erection of any pier, jetty or breakwater, raised above the high watermark of any navigable water, title thereto shall vest in the owner of that land which, immediately prior to the raising of the land in question, directly adjoined the navigable water. The tract, title to which is thus vested in a riparian owner, shall include only the front of his formerly riparian tract and shall be confined within extensions of his property lines, which extensions shall be perpendicular to the channel, or main watercourses.

If any land is, by act of man, raised above the high watermark of any navigable water by filling, except such filling be to reclaim lands theretofore lost to the owner by natural causes or as otherwise provided under the proviso of subsection (d), title thereto shall vest in the State and the land so raised shall become a part of the vacant and unappropriated lands of the State, unless the commission of the act which caused the raising of the land in question shall have been previously approved in the manner provided in subsection (c) of this section. Title to land so raised, however, does not vest in the State if the land was raised within the bounds of a conveyance made by the State Board of Education, which included regularly flooded estuarine marshlands or lands beneath navigable waters, or if the land was raised under permits issued to private individuals pursuant to

G.S. 113-229

,

G.S. 113A-100

through 113A-128, or both.

If any owner of land adjoining any navigable water desires to fill in the area immediately in front of his land, he may apply to the Department of Administration for an easement to make such fill. The applicant shall deliver to each owner of riparian property adjoining that of the applicant, a copy of the application filed with the Department of Administration, and each such person shall have 30 days from the date of such service to file with the Department of Administration written objections to the granting of the proposed easement. If the Department of Administration finds that the purpose of the proposed fill is to reclaim lands theretofore lost to the owner by natural causes, no easement to fill shall be required. In such a case the Department shall give the applicant written permission to proceed with the project. If the purpose of the proposed fill is not to reclaim lands lost by natural causes and the Department finds that the proposed fill will not impede navigation or otherwise interfere with the use of the navigable water by the public or injure any adjoining riparian owner, it shall issue to such applicant an easement to fill and shall fix the consideration to be paid for the easement, subject to the approval of the Governor and Council of State in each instance. The granting by the State of the written permission or easement so to fill shall be deemed conclusive evidence and proof that the applicant has complied with all requisite conditions precedent to the issuance of such written permission or easement, and his right shall not thereafter be subject to challenge by reason of any alleged omission on his part. None of the provisions of this section shall relieve any riparian owner of the requirements imposed by the applicable laws and regulations of the United States. Upon completion of such filling, the Governor and Council of State may, upon request, direct the execution of a quitclaim deed therefor to the owner to whom the easement was granted, conveying the land so raised, upon such terms as are deemed proper by the Department and approved by the Governor and Council of State.

If an island is, by any process of nature or by act of man, formed in any navigable water, title to such island shall vest in the State and the island shall become a part of the vacant and unappropriated lands of the State. Provided, however, that if in any process of dredging, by either the State or federal government, for the purpose of deepening any harbor or inland waterway, or clearing out or creating the same, a deposit of the excavated material is made upon the lands of any owner, and title to which at the time is not vested in either the State or federal government, or any other person, whether such excavation be deposited with or without the approval of the owner or owners of such lands, all such additions to lands shall accrue to the use and benefit of the owner or owners of the land or lands on which such deposit shall have been made, and such owner or owners shall be deemed vested in fee simple with the title to the same.

The Governor and Council of State may, upon proof satisfactory to them that any land has been raised above the high watermark of any navigable water by any process of nature or by the erection of any pier, jetty or breakwater, and that this, or any other provision of this section vests title in the riparian owner thereof, whenever it may be necessary to do so in order to establish clear title to such land in the riparian owner, direct execution of a quitclaim deed thereto, conveying to such owner all of the State’s right, title, and interest in such raised land.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, the title to land in or immediately along the Atlantic Ocean raised above the mean high water mark by publicly financed projects which involve hydraulic dredging or other deposition of spoil materials or sand vests in the State. Title to such lands raised through projects that received no public funding vests in the adjacent littoral proprietor. All such raised lands shall remain open to the free use and enjoyment of the people of the State, consistent with the public trust rights in ocean beaches, which rights are part of the common heritage of the people of this State.

History.

1959, c. 683, s. 1; 1979, c. 414; 1985, c. 276.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Public Rights and Coastal Zone Management,” see 51 N.C.L. Rev. 1 (1972).

For comment, “Sunbathers Versus Property Owners: Public Access to North Carolina Beaches,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 159 (1985).

For article, “The Battle to Preserve North Carolina’s Estuarine Marshes: The 1985 Legislation, Private Claims to Estuarine Marshes, Denial of Permits to Fill, and the Public Trust,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 565 (1986).

For article, “The Pearl in the Oyster: The Public Trust Doctrine in North Carolina,” see 12 Campbell L. Rev. 23 (1989).

For article, “Coastal Management Law in North Carolina: 1974-1994,” see 72 N.C.L. Rev. 1413 (1994).

For article, “The Changing Face of the Shoreline: Public and Private Rights to the Natural and Nourished Dry Sand Beaches of North Carolina,” see 78 N.C.L. Rev. 1869 (2000).

For note, “A First Step in the Wrong Direction: Slavin v. Town of Oak Island and the Taking of Littoral Rights of Direct Beach Access,” see 82 N.C.L. Rev. 1510 (2004).

For article, “North Carolina Oceanfront Property and Public Waters and Beaches: The Rights of Littoral Owners in the Twenty-First Century,” see 83 N.C. L. Rev. 1427 (2005).

§ 146-6.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 366.

§ 146-7.
Sale of timber rights; procedure; instruments conveying rights; disposition of proceeds.

The Department of Administration may sell timber rights in the vacant and unappropriated lands, swamplands, and lands acquired by the State by virtue of being sold for taxes, at public or private sale, at such times, upon such consideration, in such portions, and upon such terms as are deemed proper by the Department and approved by the Governor and Council of State. Every instrument conveying timber rights shall be executed in the manner required of deeds by

G.S. 146-74

through 146-78, and shall be approved by the Governor and Council of State as therein required, or by the agency designated by the Governor and Council of State to approve conveyances of such rights. The net proceeds of all sales of timber from those lands shall be paid into the State Literary Fund.

History.

1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-8.
Disposition of mineral deposits in State lands under water.

The State, acting at the request of the Department of Environmental Quality, is fully authorized and empowered to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any and all mineral deposits belonging to the State which may be found in the bottoms of any sounds, rivers, creeks, or other waters of the State. The State, acting at the request of the Department of Environmental Quality, is authorized and empowered to convey or lease to such person or persons as it may, in its discretion, determine, the right to take, dig, and remove from such bottoms such mineral deposits found therein belonging to the State as may be sold, leased, or otherwise disposed of to them by the State. The State, acting at the request of the Department of Environmental Quality, is authorized to grant to any person, firm, or corporation, within designated boundaries for definite periods of time, the right to such mineral deposits, or to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of same upon such other terms and conditions as may be deemed wise and expedient by the State and to the best interest of the State. Before any such sale, lease, or contract is made, it shall be approved by the Department of Administration and by the Governor and Council of State.

Any sale, lease, or other disposition of such mineral deposits shall be made subject to all rights of navigation and subject to such other terms and conditions as may be imposed by the State.

The net proceeds derived from the sale, lease, or other disposition of such mineral deposits shall be paid into the treasury of the State, but the same shall be used exclusively by the Department of Environmental Quality in paying the costs of administration of this section and for the development and conservation of the natural resources of the State, including any advertising program which may be adopted for such purpose, all of which shall be subject to the approval of the Governor, acting by and with the advice of the Council of State.

History.

1937, c. 385; C.S., s. 113-26; 1959, c. 683, s. 1; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 218; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in the first and last paragraphs.

§ 146-9.
Disposition of mineral deposits in State lands not under water.

The Department of Administration may sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of mineral rights or deposits in the vacant and unappropriated lands, swamplands, and lands acquired by the State by virtue of being sold for taxes, not lying beneath the waters of the State, at such times, upon such consideration, in such portions, and upon such terms as are deemed proper by the Department and approved by the Governor and Council of State. Every instrument conveying such rights shall be executed in the manner required of deeds by

G.S. 146-74

through 146-78, and shall be approved by the Governor and Council of State as therein provided, or by the agency designated by the Governor and Council of State to approve conveyances of such rights. The net proceeds of dispositions of all such mineral rights or deposits shall be paid into the State Literary Fund.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, or any other provision of law, prior to expiration of a lease of mineral deposits in State lands, the Department of Administration or other entity designated by the Department shall solicit competitive bids for lease of such mineral deposits, which shall include a process for upset bids as described in this subsection. An upset bid is an increased or raised bid whereby a person offers to lease such mineral rights for an amount exceeding the highest bid received in response to the initial solicitation for competitive bids, or the last upset bid, as applicable, by a minimum of five percent (5%). The process shall provide that the Department or other designated entity that issued the solicitation for competitive bids shall issue a notice of high bid to the person submitting the highest bid in response to the initial solicitation for competitive bids, or the person submitting the last upset bid, as applicable, and any other bidders that have submitted a bid in an amount seventy-five percent (75%) or more of the highest bid received in response to the initial solicitation for competitive bids, or the last upset bid, as applicable, of the highest bid received at that point within 10 days of the closure of the bidding period, as provided in the solicitation for competitive bids, through notice delivered by any means authorized under

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4. Thereafter, an upset bid may be made by delivering to the Department or other designated entity, subject to all of the following requirements and conditions:

With a deposit in cash, certified check, or cashier’s check in an amount greater than or equal to five percent (5%) of the amount of the highest bid received in response to the initial solicitation for competitive bids, or the last upset bid, as applicable. The deposit required by this section shall be filed by the close of normal business hours on the tenth day after issuance of the Department or other designated entity’s notice of high bid. If the tenth day falls upon a weekend or legal holiday, the deposit may be made and the notice of upset bid may be filed on the first business day following that day. There may be successive upset bids, each of which shall be followed by a period of 10 days for a further upset bid.

The Department or other designated entity may require an upset bidder to deposit a cash bond, or, in lieu thereof at the option of the bidder, a surety bond, approved by the Department or other designated entity. The compliance bond shall be in an amount the Department or other designated entity deems adequate, but in no case greater than the amount of the bid of the person being required to furnish the bond, less the amount of any required deposit. The compliance bond shall be payable to the State of North Carolina and shall be conditioned on the principal obligor’s compliance with the bid.

At the time that an upset bid is submitted pursuant to this subsection, together with a compliance bond if one is required, the upset bidder shall file a notice of upset bid with the Department or other designated entity. The notice of upset bid shall include all of the following:

State the name, address, and telephone number of the upset bidder.

Specify the amount of the upset bid.

Provide that the lease shall remain open for a period of 10 days after the date on which the notice of upset bid is filed for the filing of additional upset bids as permitted by law.

Be signed by the upset bidder or the attorney or the agent of the upset bidder.

When an upset bid is made as provided in this subsection, the Department or other designated entity shall notify the highest prior bidder, and any other bidders that have submitted a bid in an amount seventy-five percent (75%) or more of the current high bid received in response to the initial solicitation for competitive bids, or the last upset bid, as applicable.

When an upset bid is made as provided in this subsection, the last prior bidder is released from any further obligation on account of the bid, and any deposit or bond provided by the last prior bidder shall be released.

Any person offering to lease mineral deposits in State lands by upset bid as permitted in this subsection is subject to and bound by the terms of the original notice of lease.

The Department of Administration shall require that any lessee of mineral deposits in State lands diligently conduct continuous mining operations for minerals subject to the lease throughout the entire term of the lease.

The Department of Administration shall adopt rules to implement subsection (c) of this section.

History.

1959, c. 683, s. 1; 2015-276, s. 5; 2017-102, s. 27.

§ 146-10.
Leases.

The Department of Administration may lease or rent the vacant and unappropriated lands, swamplands, and lands acquired by the State by virtue of being sold for taxes, at such times, upon such consideration, in such portions, and upon such terms as it may deem proper. Every lease or rental of such lands by the Department shall be approved by the Governor and Council of State, or by the agency designated by the Governor and Council of State to approve such leases and rentals.

History.

1959, c. 683, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Wind Over North Carolina Waters:
The State’s Preparedness to Address Offshore and Coastal Water-Based Wind Energy Projects,” see 87 N.C.L. Rev. 1819 (2009).

§ 146-11.
Easements, rights-of-way, etc.

The Department of Administration may grant easements, rights-of-way, dumping rights and other interests in State lands, for the purpose of

Cooperating with the federal government,

Utilizing the natural resources of the State, or

Otherwise serving the public interest.

The Department shall fix the terms and consideration upon which such rights may be granted. Every instrument conveying such interests shall be executed in the manner required of deeds by

G.S. 146-74

through 146-78, and shall be approved by the Governor and Council of State as therein provided, or by the agency designated by the Governor and Council of State to approve conveyances of such interests.

History.

1959, c. 683, s. 1.

§ 146-12.
Easements in lands covered by water.

The Department of Administration may grant, to adjoining riparian or littoral owners, easements in lands covered by navigable waters or by the waters of any lake owned by the State for such purposes and upon such conditions as it may deem proper, with the approval of the Governor and Council of State. The Department may, with the approval of the Governor and Council of State, revoke any such easement upon the violation by the grantee or his assigns of the conditions upon which it was granted.Every such easement shall include only the front of the tract owned by the riparian or littoral owner to whom the easement is granted, shall extend no further than the deep water, and shall in no respect obstruct or impair navigation.When any such easement is granted in front of the lands of any incorporated town, the governing body of the town shall regulate the line on deep water to which wharves may be built.

Easements Not Requiring Approval by the Governor or Council of State. — In accordance with the provisions in subsections (c) through (m) of this section, the Department of Administration shall grant easements to adjoining riparian or littoral owners in State-owned lands covered by navigable waters without the approval of the Governor and the Council of State for:

Existing structures permitted under Article 7 of Chapter 113A or structures existing prior to the effective date of the permitting requirements of Article 7 of Chapter 113A of the General Statutes.

New structures permitted under Article 7 of Chapter 113A of the General Statutes after the effective date of this section.

Voluntary Easement Applications for Existing Structures. — Riparian or littoral property owners of existing structures may voluntarily obtain an easement under subsection (b) of this section in accordance with the procedures set forth in this section. For purposes of this section, the term “existing structures” means all presently existing piers, docks, marinas, wharves, and other structures located over or upon State-owned lands covered by navigable waters. Applications for voluntary easements shall be received by the State Property Office no later than October 1, 2001.

Notification of Availability of Voluntary Easements. — The State Property Office shall provide public notice of the availability of voluntary easements by placing an advertisement in one newspaper of general circulation in each of the coastal counties identified under G.S. 113A-103(2) at least once every six months. The final notice shall be placed no later than September 1, 2001.

Mandatory Easement Applications for New Structures. — Riparian or littoral property owners of new structures shall obtain an easement under subsection (b) of this section in accordance with the procedures set forth in this section.

Easement Application. — An application by a riparian or littoral owner of a new or existing structure for an easement under subsection (b) of this section shall include all of the following and shall:

Be made in writing to the State Property Office and include the full name and address of the easement applicant.

Include a plat depicting the footprint and total square footage of all structures located in or over State-owned lands covered by navigable waters. The footprint shall include the total square footage of the area of State-owned lands covered by navigable waters that are enclosed on three or more sides by any structure.

Include a copy of any “CAMA” permit required for structures under Article 7 of Chapter 113A of the General Statutes.

Include a copy of the deed or other instrument through which the applicant establishes ownership of the adjacent riparian or littoral property.

Specify the use or uses associated with the structure to be covered by the easement.

Include the appropriate easement purchase payment.

Easement Terms. — Any easement granted under subsection (b) of this section shall be in a form suitable for recordation and shall be executed by either the Director or Deputy Director of the State Property Office. The State-owned lands covered by navigable waters included within the easement shall be limited to the footprint of the structure. The terms of each easement shall provide that the easement:

Is appurtenant to specifically described, adjacent riparian or littoral property and runs with the land.

Specifies that the holder of the easement shall not exclude or prevent the public from exercising public trust rights, including commercial and recreational fishing, shellfishing, seine netting, pound netting, and other fishing rights.

Specifies that the holder of the easement obtains no additional rights to interfere with the approval, issuance, or renewal of shellfish or water column leases or to interfere with the use or cultivation of existing shellfish leases, water column leases, or shellfish franchises.

Specifies that any rights conveyed to the holder of the easement are not inconsistent with the rights conferred by previous conveyances made by the State for the same property.

Is valid for a term of 50 years from the date of issuance.

Is eligible for one renewal term of 50 years.

Is granted in the public interest for good and valuable consideration received by the State.

Specifies by metes and bounds description or attached plat the footprint of the structure for which the easement is issued.

Describes the uses of the structure for which the easement is being granted, which may include:

Providing reasonable access for all vessels traditionally used in the main watercourse area to deep water or, where present, to a specified navigational channel;

Mooring vessels at or adjacent to the structure;

Enhancing or improving the value of the adjacent riparian or littoral property; and

All other reasonable, nonexclusive public trust uses as specified in the easement application, to the extent not otherwise limited by provisions of this Subchapter or any other law.

Specifies that rights granted include the right to repair, rebuild, or restore existing structures consistent with Article 7 of Chapter 113A of the General Statutes.

Specifies that the exercise of any rights under the easement shall be contingent upon obtaining all required permits.

Easement Purchase Payment. — The easement purchase payment for easements issued under subsection (b) of this section shall be computed on the basis of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per acre of footprint coverage prorated in increments of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) rounded up to the nearest quarter acre. The minimum payment shall be five hundred dollars ($500.00) if any payment is owed after the riparian credit is applied. In recognition of common law riparian and littoral rights and a declared public policy concern that easements provided under this section be available to all citizens, a credit shall be given against any easement purchase payment in an amount equal to the number of linear feet of shoreline multiplied by a factor of 54 feet. No linear feet of shoreline may be used in computing the credit if that area of shoreline has been the basis of a previous credit. For purposes of determining the linear feet of shoreline owned, an application submitted by a corporation or other entity whose members include riparian or littoral lot owners, which owners have the right to use the structure for which the easement is sought, and whose lots are restricted from construction thereon of other structures for similar use, shall be considered an application whose easement purchase payment shall be determined by using the entirety of such use restricted shoreline for purposes of determining the applicable riparian credit. Shoreline utilization shall be considered “use restricted” if riparian or littoral structures are prohibited by either permit condition or by restrictive covenant or similar, enforceable private restriction.

Easement Issuance. — Within 75 days of receipt of a completed application under subsection (f) of this section, the Director or Deputy Director of the State Property Office shall issue the requested easement in a form sufficient for recording in the register of deeds of the county or counties in which any part of the structure is located. The act of easement issuance under subsection (b) of this section shall be exempt from the provisions in Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. Failure to issue the requested easement within 75 days of receipt of a completed application and any applicable easement purchase payments shall be treated as issuance of the requested easement and shall entitle the applicant to execution and issuance of the easement.

Easement Renewal. — Upon written request from the current easement holder, easements shall be renewed for one additional term of 50 years. Renewal easements shall be subject to the terms, conditions, and purchase payments applicable to initial easements at the time of renewal. Written notification of expiring easements shall be provided by the State Property Office at least 180 days prior to expiration of the initial easement term. Letter applications for renewal easements shall be submitted within 180 days of the notice of expiration by the State Property Office.

Easement Modification. — Any expansion of the footprint of an existing structure shall require an easement or modification of any existing easement. The application for a modification of an easement shall be as provided in subsection (f) of this section. The easement purchase payment shall be based only on the footprint of the expansion after applying the riparian credit. The minimum easement purchase payment shall be five hundred dollars ($500.00) if any payment is owed after the riparian credit is applied. Easement holders may voluntarily apply for modification of an easement to correct any material errors or omissions. No easement purchase payment shall be required for the modification of an existing use that does not expand the footprint of the existing structure. No refunds shall be provided for any modification that reduces the footprint.

Easement Transfers. — An easement granted under subsection (b) of this section shall be transferred to a subsequent owner of the adjacent riparian or littoral property upon written notification to the State Property Office. The notification shall be given within 12 months of the transfer of title to the adjacent riparian or littoral property and shall be accompanied by the instrument of transfer and an easement purchase payment as follows:

During the first 25 years of the easement term, the easement purchase payment shall be the same as the initial payment; and

During the second 25 years of the easement term, the easement purchase payment shall be twice the amount of the initial payment.

Easement Revocation. — Easements issued under subsection (b) of this section may be revoked in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 146-12(a)

. Any revocation shall entitle the easement holder to seek administrative review in accordance with the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

Exemptions. — The following types of structures shall not require an easement under this section:

Piers, docks, or similar structures for the exclusive use of the owner or occupant of the adjacent riparian or littoral property, which generate no revenue directly related to the structure and which accommodate no more than ten vessels;

Structures constructed by any public utility that provide or assist in the provision of utility service;

Structures constructed or owned by the State of North Carolina, or any political subdivision, agency, or department of the State, for the duration that the structures are owned by the entity; or

Structures on submerged lands or lands covered by navigable waters not owned by or for the benefit of the public that have been created by dredging or excavating lands.

History.

1854-5, c. 21; R.C., c. 42, s. 1; Code, s. 2751; 1889, c. 555; 1891, c. 532; 1893, cc. 4, 17, 349; 1901, c. 364; Rev., s. 1696; C.S., s. 7543; G.S., s. 146-6; 1959, c. 683, s. 1; 1995, c. 529, s. 2; 1998-217, s. 35(a), (b).

Local Modification.

Craven: 1973, c. 1129.

Cross References.

For note relating to the State-Owned Submerged Lands Advisory Committee, see Editor’s notes to

G.S. 146-1

.

§ 146-13.
Erection of piers on State lakes restricted.

No person, firm, or corporation shall erect upon the floor of, or in or upon, the waters of any State lake, any dock, pier, pavilion, boathouse, bathhouse, or other structure, without first having secured a permit to do so from the Department of Administration, or from the agency designated by the Department to issue such permits. Each permit shall set forth in required detail the size, cost, and nature of such structure; and any person, firm, or corporation erecting any such structure without a proper permit or not in accordance with the specifications of such permit shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor. The State may immediately proceed to remove such unlawful structure through due process of law, or may abate or remove the same as a nuisance after five days’ notice.

History.

1933, c. 516, s. 3; G.S., s. 146-10; 1959, c. 683, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 1051; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 146-14.
Proceeds of dispositions of certain State lands.

The net proceeds of all sales, leases, rentals, or other dispositions of the vacant and unappropriated lands, swamplands, and lands acquired by the State by virtue of being sold for taxes, and all interests and rights therein, shall be paid into the State Literary Fund, except as otherwise provided in this Chapter.

History.

1959, c. 683, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Removing Local Elected Officials From Office in North Carolina,” see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 547 (1980).

§ 146-14.1.
Natural Resources Easement Fund.

The Natural Resources Easement Fund is established as a nonreverting fund within the Department of Administration. All easement purchase payment monies collected by the Secretary shall be deposited in the Fund. The Fund may be used for direct costs of administering the program. Fifty percent (50%) of the net proceeds in the Fund shall be transferred annually to the Marine Fisheries Commission, and fifty percent (50%) of the net proceeds in the Fund shall be transferred annually to the Wildlife Resources Commission, to be used by both Commissions for the sole purpose of enhancing public trust resources and increasing the public’s access to and use of public trust resources, including, but not limited to, meeting the State’s cost share obligations for federal Wallop-Breaux Fund projects, enhancing water resources and expanding the number of public boat ramps and other means of public waters access within the counties designated under G.S. 113A-103(2), and other public trust access purposes.

History.

1995, c. 529, s. 3.

§ 146-15.
Definition of net proceeds.

For the purposes of this Subchapter, the term “net proceeds” means the gross amount received from the sale, lease, rental, or other disposition of any State lands, less

Such expenses incurred incident to that sale, lease, rental, or other disposition as may be allowed under rules and regulations adopted by the Governor and approved by the Council of State; and

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 553, s. 52, effective July 24, 1993.

A service charge to be paid into the State Land Fund.

The amount or rate of such service charge shall be fixed by rules and regulations adopted by the Governor and approved by the Council of State, but as to any particular sale, lease, rental, or other disposition, it shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the gross amount received from such sale, lease, rental, or other disposition. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Subchapter, no service charge shall be paid into the State Land Fund from proceeds derived from the sale of land or products of land owned or held for the use of the Wildlife Resources Commission, or purchased or acquired with funds of the Wildlife Resources Commission.

History.

1959, c. 683, s. 1; 1993, c. 553, s. 52.